Maine, session 132, LD658.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§1-B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 343, Pt. H, §2, is
further amended to read:
1-B. Additional exemption. A homestead eligible for an exemption under subsection
1 is eligible for an additional exemption of $5,000 of the just value of the homestead for
property tax years beginning on April 1, 2016, $10,000 of the just value of the homestead
for property tax years beginning on April 1, 2017, April 1, 2018 and April 1, 2019, and
$15,000 of the just value of the homestead for property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2020, April 1, 2021, April 1, 2022, April 1, 2023 and April 1, 2024 and $40,000
of the just value of the homestead for property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025.